Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-359
Well-boring apparatus, defined.

Well-boring apparatus means trucks, truck-tractors, or combinations of trucks or truck-tractors and trailers which are not for hire and are used exclusively to travel to and from the well site including (1) the well rig truck, (2) the boom truck, (3) the water tank truck, and (4) such other devices as are used exclusively for transporting well-boring apparatus to and from the well site including the drill stem, casing, drilling mud, pumps and related equipment, and well-site excavating machinery or equipment.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 59.